fst/morphology/orthography/spellrelax_weighted.xfscript
# Copyright © 2026 Alberta Language Technology Lab (ALTLab)
# http://altlab.ualberta.ca/
#
# This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
# this file under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.
#
# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Affero General Public License for more details.
#
# You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
# along with this program. If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# Plains Cree long vowel variation.

define Vshort [ a | i | o ];
define Vlong  [ â | ê | î | ô ];
define Vowel [ Vshort | Vlong ];

define Cvoiced [ b | d | g ];
define Cvoiceless [ p | t | k | c ];

define Consonant [ c | h | k | m | n | p | s | š | t | w | y | ý | Cvoiced ];
define Stop      [ c | k | p | t ];
define Glide     [ w | y | ý ];
define Nasal     [ n | m ];
define Sibilant  [ s | {sh} | š | c ];

regex [

# Prefix-final vowel (preceded by consonant) dropped before following morpheme
# [ a | â | ê | i | î | o | ô ]  (->) 0 || [ c | k | m | n | p | s | t | w | y | ý ] _ %- ,,
[ a | â | ê | i | î | o | ô ] %- (->) %-::1.0 ,,
# Vowel (->) 0 || Consonant _ %- ,,

# Sandhi at prefix boundaries
# %- -> 0 ,
# [ a | â | ê | i | î | o | ô ] %- [ a | â ] (->) [ a | â ] ,
# [ a | â | ê | i | î | o | ô ] %- ê (->) [ e | ê ] , 
# [ a | â | ê | i | î | o | ô ] %- [ i | î ] (->) [ i | î ] , 
# [ a | â | ê | i | î | o | ô ] %- [ o | ô ] (->) [ o | ô ] , 
Vowel %- [ a | â ] (->) [ a | â ]::2.0 ,, 
Vowel %- ê (->) [ e | ê ]::2.0 ,,
Vowel %- [ i | î ] (->) [ i | î ]::2.0 ,,
Vowel %- [ o | ô ] (->) [ o | ô ]::2.0 ,,

# Dealing with spaces instead of hyphens as separators in multipart words, or missing hyphens

[ %- ] (->) [ %- ]+ ,,                # Multiple hyphens into a single hyphen
[ %- ] (->) 0 ,,                      # Missing hyphens between prefixes/preverbs
[ %- ] (->) [ %  | %  | %  ]+ ,,      # Multiple non-breaking or standard spaces SPACE + NBSP + NNBSP (in syllabics) to single hyphen
[ %-] (->) h::1.0 || Vowel _ Vowel ,, # Epenthetic -h- instead of hyphen separating preverbs

# Glides
# e.g., "tanisi ê-isiyihkâsoyan" -> "tan'si ê-sikâsowan"
# TODO: figure out what conditions this (probably /o/ or /i/)
# These rules without context are EXCESSIVELY productive!
# y (->) w,
# w (->) y,

{iw} (->) {ow}::1.0 ,,       # Misspelling based on assimilated pronunciation of underlying /i/ as /o/ before /w/
{ow} (->) {iw}::1.0 ,,
[ ê [ y | ý ] i h t ] (->) {êht}::1.0 ,,
[ ê [ y | ý ] i h t ] (->) {êt}::1.0 ,,
[ ê [ y | ý ] i m ] (->) {êm}::1.0 ,,
[ i [ y | ý ] ( i ) ] (->) [ î | i ]::1.0 ,, # Mishearing of vowel-glide-vowel cluster
{nwa} (->) {no}::1.0 ,,      # <nwa> is likely to be heard as <no>

[..] (->) h::1.0 || _ .#. ,, # Excessive word-final pre-aspiration
#    h (->) 0 || [ a | i | o | â | ê | î | ô ] _ [ c | k | p | t | g | b | d ] ,,    # Missing preaspiration before stops
# [..] (->) h || [ a | i | o | â | ê | î | ô ] _ [ c | k | p | t | g | b | d ] ,,  # Excessive preaspiration before stops
   h (->) 0::0.5 || Vowel _ Stop ,,    # Missing preaspiration before stops
[..] (->) h::1.0 || Vowel _ Stop ,,  # Excessive preaspiration before stops

# Adding missing or reduced short i's in interconsonantal contexts
i (->) 0::1.0 || Consonant _ Consonant

# Removing morpheme boundary markers (middle-dots)
# [..] (->) {·}

];

define CommonMispellings

regex
[
# Converting from Woods Cree and Swampy Cree to Plains Cree
[ ý | y ] (->) [ t h ] ,,
[ ý | y ] (->) [ n ]::4.0 ,,
ê (->) [ î | i ]::2.0 ,,

## Dealing with English-influenced divergences from SRO, and misspellings based on modern pronunciation

# Vowels
[ i | î ] (->) {ee} ,,
[ a | â ] (->) [ u (h) ] ,,
ê (->) [ {ay} | {eh} ]::2.0 ,,

# Consonants
k (->) g ,,   # intervocalic voiced pronunciation to stops, maybe context should be added (including <c> overgenerates)
p (->) b ,,   # intervocalic voiced pronunciation to stops, maybe context should be added
t (->) d ,,   # intervocalic voiced pronunciation to stops, maybe context should be added
c (->) j ,,   # English influence on spelling <c>

# Consonant clusters
c (->) {ch} ,,        # English influence on spelling <c>
c (->) {tch} ,,       # English influence on spelling <c>
c (->) {ts} ,,        # Another English influence on spelling <c>

# Standardizing double-vowel notation for long vowels
â (->) {aa} ,,
î (->) {ii} ,,
ô (->) {oo} ,,

# Sibilant variation within Swampy Cree
s (->) š

];

define EnglishInfluence

## Potentially wrong diacritics on vowels
regex [

# Proto-Algonquian dialectal /y/
ý (->) y ,,
y (->) ý ,,

# short-i elision
i (->) [ %' | ‘ | ’ ] ,,

â (->) ā ,, # a macron
ê (->) ē ,, # e macron
î (->) ī ,, # i macron
ô (->) ō ,, # o macron

# Long vowel markings are frequently dropped:

â (->) a::0.25 ,,
ê (->) e::0.00 ,,
î (->) i::0.25 ,,
ô (->) o::0.25 ,,

# Long vowel markings are sometimes incorrect (in particular before glides):
# E.g. NS 152 materials consistantly write some vowels as long where SRO/AEW
# writes them as short.
# E.g. NS 152 gives 'askîy' but AEW gives 'askiy' according to SRO conventions.
a (->) â::0.5 ,,
i (->) î::0.5 ,,
o (->) ô::0.5 ,,

# Standardizing rarer SRO marking of long vowels with accent-aigu
[ a | â ] (->) á ,,
ê (->) é ,,
[ i | î ] (->) í ,,
[ o | ô ] (->) ó

];

define Diacritics

# Converting combining characters into precomposed ones (for the potentially diacriticized vowels).
regex
[
â -> {ā} ,, # a + combining macron U+0304
ê -> {ē} ,, # e + combining macron U+0304
î -> {ī} ,, # i + combining macron U+0304
ô -> {ō} ,, # o + combining macron U+0304

â -> {â} ,, # a + combining circumflex accent U+0302
ê -> {ê} ,, # e + combining circumflex accent U+0302
î -> {î} ,, # i + combining circumflex accent U+0302
ô -> {ô}    # o + combining circumflex accent U+0302
];

define CompositeChars

regex [
CommonMispellings
.o. EnglishInfluence
.o. Diacritics
.o. CompositeChars
];

# Format/explanation:
# lexical side (->) input
# Or, in other words:
# correct (->) in use out there
